Missouri, session 2026, HB2810.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 160, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 160.3400, to read as follows:
160.3400. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "School", the same meaning as defined in section 160.077;
(2) "School district", the same meaning as defined in section 160.011;
(3) "Youth organization", a corporation chartered by Congress and listed in
Title 36, Subtitle II, Part B, as of January 1, 2026.
2. (1) Each school district shall, upon request, allow a representative of any
youth organization to provide:
(a) Oral or written information to the students of such school district regarding
the youth organization and how such youth organization furthers the educational
interests and civic involvement of students in a manner consistent with good citizenship;
and
(b) Services and activities to any student of such school district who is a member
of such youth organization.
(2) Each requesting youth organization shall be permitted to provide such
information, services, and activities in a school building or on the school grounds of a
school in each school district at least once during each school year.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2810 2
3. Each school district shall make a good-faith effort to select a date, time, and
location for each requesting youth organization to provide such information, services, or
activities that is mutually agreeable to the school district and to the youth organization.
Oral information provided under paragraph (a) of subdivision (1) of subsection 2 of this
section shall be provided only during noninstructional time.
4. Prior to allowing a representative of a youth organization to provide
information, services, or activities at a school under this section, such representative
shall be subject to a background check. Except as otherwise provided by this section or
by procedures set forth by the Missouri state highway patrol, the parameters of the
background check shall be determined by the relevant school district. A school district
may prohibit any representative of a youth organization who has been convicted of a
felony from providing information, services, or activities under this section at any school
in such school district. Each representative of a youth organization is responsible for all
costs associated with obtaining such background check.
✔